North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-62.2 Student Financial Assistance and Scholars Program [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 24]

15-62.2-00.1.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 241, § 1; 1989, ch. 247, § 1; 1997, ch. 185, § 1; 2003, ch. 142, § 1; 2005, ch. 149, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-01.
Student financial assistance and scholars programs — Establishment — Administrative responsibility. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 173, § 1; 1975, ch. 181, § 1; 1977, ch. 185, § 1; 1979, ch. 268, § 1; 1987, ch. 241, § 7; 1989, ch. 247, § 2; 1995, ch. 54, § 8; 2005, ch. 31, § 26; 2007, ch. 159, § 2; 2009, ch. 168, § 2; 2013, ch. 144, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-02.
State board of higher education — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 173, § 2; 1979, ch. 268, § 2; 1987, ch. 241, § 8; 1989, ch. 247, § 3; 1989, ch. 248, § 1; 2005, ch. 150, § 1; 2009, ch. 31, § 36; 2013, ch. 34, § 17; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-03.
Advisory board — Membership — Appointment — Authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 173, § 3; 1979, ch. 268, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-03.1.
Administration of scholars program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 241, § 2; 1989, ch. 247, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-03.2.
Reapplication eligibility — Amount of scholarships — Duration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 241, § 3; 1989, ch. 247, § 5; 1993, ch. 206, § 1; 2003, ch. 142, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-03.3.
Selection of scholars. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 241, § 4; 1989, ch. 247, § 6; 1997, ch. 185, § 2; 2003, ch. 142, § 3; 2003, ch. 143, § 1; 2005, ch. 149, § 2; repealed by 2015, hb1003, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-03.4.
Payment of scholarships. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 241, § 5; 1989, ch. 247, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-03.5.
Use of funds — Refund policy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 241, § 6; 1989, ch. 247, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.2-04.
Funds received by the state board of higher education — Where deposited — How appropriated — How expended. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 145, § 1.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 1 of chapter 145, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

15-62.2-05.
Annual report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 31, §
37; repealed by 2015, ch. 3, § 24, effective August 1, 2015.